District of Columbia statutes.
29-410.01

Disposition of assets not requiring member approval.

Approval of the members of a nonprofit corporation shall not be required, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide, to:

(1)

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the corporation’s assets:

(A)

In the usual and regular course of its activities; or

(B)

If the corporation and its consolidated subsidiaries retain an activity that represented or was supported by at least 33% of total assets at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year;

(2)

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber any or all of the corporation’s assets, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business its [sic] activities; or

(3)

Transfer any or all of the corporation’s assets to one or more corporations or other entities all of the memberships or interests of which are owned by the corporation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-410.02 and § 29-410.03.